Missouri, session 2026, HB3473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 620.511, 620.512, and 620.513, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 620.511, 620.512, 620.513, and
620.514, to read as follows:
620.511. 1. There is hereby established the "Missouri Workforce Development
Board", formerly known as the Missouri workforce investment board, and hereinafter referred
to as "the board" in sections 620.511 to [620.513] 620.514.
2. The purpose of the board is to provide workforce investment activities, through
statewide and local workforce investment systems, that increase the employment, retention,
and earnings of participants, and increase occupational skill attainment by participants, and,
as a result, improve the quality of the workforce, reduce welfare dependency, and enhance the
productivity and competitiveness of the state of Missouri. The board shall be the state's
advisory board pertaining to workforce preparation policy.
3. The board shall meet the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act, hereinafter referred to as the "WIOA", P.L. 113-128, as amended. Should
another federal law supplant the WIOA, all references in sections 620.511 to [620.513]
620.514 to the WIOA shall apply as well to the new federal law.
4. Composition of the board shall comply with the WIOA. Board members appointed
by the governor shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Consistent with the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3473 2
requirements of the WIOA, the governor shall designate one member of the board to be its
chairperson.
5. Each member of the board shall serve for a term of four years, subject to the
pleasure of the governor, and until a successor is duly appointed. In the event of a vacancy on
the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment and said
replacement shall serve the remainder of the original appointee's unexpired term.
6. Of the members initially appointed to the WIOA, formerly known as the WIA,
board, one-fourth shall be appointed for a term of four years, one-fourth shall be appointed for
a term of three years, one-fourth shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one-fourth
shall be appointed for a term of one year.
7. WIOA board members shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for
all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.
8. The department may include on its website a list of the names of the members of
the board, including the names of members of local workforce development boards, along
with information on how to contact such boards.
620.512. 1. The board shall establish bylaws governing its organization, operation,
and procedure consistent with sections 620.511 to [620.513] 620.514, and consistent with the
WIOA.
2. The board shall meet at least four times each year at the call of the chairperson.
3. In order to assure objective management and oversight, the board shall not operate
programs or provide services directly to eligible participants, but shall exist solely to plan,
coordinate, and monitor the provisions of such programs and services. A member of the
board may not vote on a matter under consideration by the board that regards the provision of
services by the member or by an entity that the member represents or would provide direct
financial benefit to the member or the immediate family of the member. A member of the
board may not engage in any other activity determined by the governor to constitute a conflict
of interest.
4. The composition and the roles and responsibilities of the board membership may
be amended to comply with any succeeding federal or state legislative or regulatory
requirements governing workforce investment activities, except that the procedure for such
change shall be outlined in state rules and regulations and adopted in the bylaws of the board.
5. The department of economic development shall provide professional, technical,
and clerical staff for the board.
6. The board may promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to administer the
provisions of sections 620.511 to [620.513] 620.514. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

HB 3473 3
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
620.513. 1. The board shall assist the governor with the functions described in
Section 101(d) of the WIOA, 29 U.S.C. Section 311d, and any regulations issued pursuant to
the WIOA.
2. The board shall submit an annual report of its activities to the governor, the speaker
of the house of representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no later than January
thirty-first of each year.
3. Nothing in sections 620.511 to [620.513] 620.514 shall be construed to require or
allow the board to assume or supersede the statutory authority granted to, or impose any
duties or requirements on, the state coordinating board for higher education, the governing
boards of the state's public colleges and universities, the state board of education, or any local
educational agencies.
620.514. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "eligible workforce
training program" shall mean a program that meets applicable requirements in Section
83002 of Pub. L. 119-21.
2. The governor shall, in consultation with the board:
(1) Approve all eligible workforce training programs for eligibility for workforce
Pell grants; and
(2) Coordinate approval of eligible workforce training programs and workforce
Pell grant awards with other state and federal workforce programs to prevent
duplicative funding for the same purpose.
3. The board shall establish an internal procedure to determine that a program
meets the requirements to be an eligible workforce training program.
4. No department, agency, or board of state government has authority to adopt
or promulgate any rule that is more restrictive than applicable federal rules to
implement this section.
✔